bg-BG: Интензивност на шума: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Други
ko: 소음 강도: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타
fi: Melun voimakkuus: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
cs: Intenzita hluku: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
sk-SK: Intenzita hluku: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
nb: Støyintensitet: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
fr: Intensité du bruit: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
zh-CN: 噪音强度: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
tr: Gürültü yoğunluğu: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
it: Intensità del rumore: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
lt-LT: Garso intensyvumas: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
nl: Geluidsintensiteit: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
da: Støjintensitet: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
en: Noise intensity: High; Low; Medium; Other
de: Lärmintensität: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
el: Ένταση θορύβου: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
ja: 騒音強度: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
es: Intensidad del ruido: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
pt-BR: Intensidade de ruído: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
ro-RO: Intensitatea zgomotului: Ridicată; Redusă; Medie; Altele
pl: Intensywność hałasu: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne
pt-PT: Intensidade de ruído: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
th: ความเข้มของเสียงรบกวน: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
hu: Zajintenzitás: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
hr-HR: Intenzitet buke: Visoki; Niski; Srednji; Ostalo
ru: Интенсивность шума: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другой
zh-TW: 噪音強度: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
sl-SI: Intenzivnost hrupa: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
vi: Cường độ tiếng ồn: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
sv: Ljudintensitet: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt